Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.902

Application—Dates—2016 c 209.

Except as otherwise provided in chapter 209, Laws of 2016, on January 1, 2017:

(1) Chapter 209, Laws of 2016 applies to a power of attorney created before, on, or after January 1, 2017;

(2) Chapter 209, Laws of 2016 applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after January 1, 2017;

(3) Chapter 209, Laws of 2016 applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced before January 1, 2017, unless the court finds that application of a provision of chapter 209, Laws of 2016 would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that provision does not apply and the superseded law applies; and

(4) An act done before January 1, 2017, is not affected by chapter 209, Laws of 2016.

[ 2016 c 209 s 503.]